Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB314.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 12503 of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 12503. Meetings.* * *(c) Telecommunications devices.--The county commissioners may provide for participation in public meetings by county commissioners and the public by means of telecommunications devices such as telephones or computer terminals that permit, at a minimum, audio communication between locations.Section 2. Section 12504(a) of Title 16, added May 8, 2024 (P.L.50, No.14), is amended to read:§ 12504. Quorum and execution of official instruments.123456789101112131415161718 (a) Quorum.--The county commissioners shall constitute a board, two members of which shall be a quorum for the transaction of business and, when convened after notice, shall be competent to perform each of the duties pertaining to the office of county commissioners. County commissioners participating in a meeting by means of telecommunications devices authorized under section 12503(c) (relating to meetings) shall be counted in establishing a quorum.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0314PN0267 - 2 - 12345678910